Vermont, session 2025-2026, H419.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 72, Sec. 37 is amended to read:
Sec. 37. TAX INCREMENT FINANCING DISTRICT; CITY OF BARRE;
EXTENSION; INCREMENT
(a) Notwithstanding 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 26a, amending
2020 Acts and Resolves No. 175, Sec. 29, or any other provision of law, the
authority of the City of Barre to incur indebtedness is hereby extended to
March 31, 2026 2028.
VT LEG #381082 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.419
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority of the City of
Barre to retain municipal and education tax increment is hereby extended until
June 30, 2039.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381082 v.1